Hawaii statutes.
[§141-36]
Growing of industrial hemp; licensee responsibilities. The licensee shall:

(1) Assume a limited agency relationship with the
board for the sole purpose of research of industrial hemp and its growth,
cultivation, and marketability. The licensee shall conduct all agricultural
operations in a lawful manner consistent with the standards befitting of an
official of the State; provided that such standards are subject to the sole
discretion and direction of the board;

(2) Abide by applicable laws and regulations incident
to the growth, cultivation, or marketing of industrial hemp;

(3) Acknowledge that any action, intended or
incidental, that is contrary to such laws and regulations, known or unknown,
falls outside the agency relationship of the licensee with the board and the
licensee's participation in the industrial hemp pilot program; provided that
this paragraph applies to all actions incident to the licensed production of
industrial hemp, including but not limited to any sale or disposition of the
resulting plants, plant materials, or seeds for which the licensee may
otherwise receive some benefit or consideration;

(4) Indemnify, hold harmless, and release forever the
State and its departments, agencies, officers, employees, and agents of any kind
from all liability claims arising out of the licensee's actions involving the
growth, cultivation, or marketing of industrial hemp;

(5) Warrant that the licensee is not an employee of
the State and shall assume total and sole responsibility for any of the
licensee's acts or omissions involving the growth or production of industrial
hemp or arising out of the licensee's participation in the industrial hemp
pilot program;

(6) Allow any institution of higher education in the
State to access those sites registered by the licensee with the board for
production of industrial hemp; provided that such access shall be allowed upon
notice from the board to the licensee and shall extend for all purposes
determined at the discretion of the board related to research of industrial
hemp and its growth, cultivation, and marketing;

(7) Upon request, allow federal, state, or local
authorities to inspect and sample the industrial hemp growing area, plants,
plant materials, seeds, equipment, or facilities incident to the growth or
production of industrial hemp;

(8) Remit to the board all license fees and other
expenses of the pilot program, including but not limited to all fees related to
sampling and analysis of hemp plants and plant materials and destruction of
resulting hemp crops found by the board to be noncompliant with applicable laws
and regulations;

(9) Agree that with respect to the licensee's
production of industrial hemp, the board's role is to fulfill regulatory
oversight of the production and, where possible, to facilitate receipt of
viable seed; provided that the licensee understands and agrees that the
licensee shall not receive compensation or wages from the board and the board
shall not offer financial resources, tangible products, or commercial labor in support
of the licensee's industrial hemp crop;

(10) Adhere narrowly to the research focus for which
the licensee is participating in the industrial hemp pilot program, if
applicable, to include one or more of the following:

(A) Planting and growing--tracking vital
statistics and yield rates with respect to industrial hemp varieties and
growing variables, including seed planting rate, soil composition, water usage,
and planting and growing season;

(B) Pest--tracking the occurrence of pests
and effectiveness of various preventative measures in correlation with
industrial hemp varieties;

(C) Cost centers and financing--tracking
average cost estimates of producing industrial hemp varieties, taking into
account costs of participation in the industrial hemp pilot program, product
acquisition, water usage, equipment, labor, and security measures and reporting
financial resources available for production of industrial hemp; or

(D) Marketing and industry
development--reporting market demand for industrial hemp varieties' raw
materials and end products, including identification of actual or potential
hemp products, processors, product manufacturers, wholesalers, retailers, and
targeted consumers;

(11) Complete and submit all reports and statements
requested by the board relative to the licensee's production of industrial
hemp; provided that a failure to submit any required or requested report may
result in revocation of the licensee's industrial hemp license;

(12) Understand and agree that any industrial hemp
grown in Hawaii without an active industrial hemp license issued by the board
falls outside the licensee's limited agency with the board, is considered to be
marijuana under state law, and constitutes impermissible growth of industrial
hemp under federal law; provided that the licensee shall understand that such
action will be prosecuted in accordance with all applicable laws;

(13) At the discretion of the board, destroy or
dispose of any industrial hemp crop, plant, plant material, or seed determined
by the board or law enforcement to be noncompliant with applicable laws or
regulations;

(14) Use best management practices for growth and
production of industrial hemp, as available, and take reasonable precaution to
prevent unauthorized growth or distribution of industrial hemp, including but
not limited to:

(A) Keeping records of all persons with
access to the growing area or hemp plants, plant materials, or seeds;

(B) Using case hardened locks and chains to
limit access to storage areas where hemp plants, plant materials, or seeds are
kept;

(C) Marking equipment and plants, if
possible, with owner applied numbers;

(D) Blocking private access roads to the
growing area with gates or barricades and posting "No Trespassing"
signs on gates, barricades, and other landmarks near the growing area and
facilities;

(E) Installing reasonable security measures
to prevent theft and posting signs indicating that cameras are used to record
activity on the growing area property;

(F) Inspecting and recording regularly the
condition of the growing area, facilities, and equipment used in the production
of industrial hemp;

(G) Conducting regular inventory counts of
hemp plants, plant materials, and seeds in order to recognize more quickly if a
theft has occurred;

(H) Contacting local law enforcement to help
identify additional security measures and encourage patrols near the growing
area;

(I) Reporting to local law enforcement any
suspicious activity and the presence of strangers near the growing area or
facility;

(J) Reporting stolen, lost, or missing hemp
plants, plant materials, or seeds to the board and law enforcement authorities
as soon as the items are noticed to be missing; and

(K) Reducing the likelihood of cross
pollination between varieties of industrial hemp and among other plants by:

(i) Separating any growing area from other
self-pollinating plants by more than ten feet;

(ii) Separating any growing area from other
wind and insect pollinating plants by more than three hundred feet; and

(iii) Employing a physical barrier such as a
hoop house or row cover to isolate industrial hemp from other plants; and

(15) Comply with any direction of the chairperson with
respect to the growth, cultivation, or marketing of industrial hemp not
otherwise contemplated in this section. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next